Massachusetts, session 194th, S2219.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 22 of chapter 30B of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after the
first paragraph, the following paragraph: Notwithstanding the provisions of any other section of
this Chapter, public procurement units that conducts a cooperative purchasing agreement may
award contracts to multiple offerors through a request for proposals if their chief procurement
officer determines that doing so is in the best interests of the parties to the cooperative
purchasing agreement.
of 1